Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB566.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 426.522 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If real or personal property is sold at public sale under any order or decree of any court in this state, then the
court under whose jurisdiction the sale is to be made may secure the services of an auctioneer licensed in this
state to conduct the public sale, fix the auctioneer's fee, and order the fee to be paid out of the proceeds of the
sale. The fee:
(a) When the sale is the result of a foreclosure process initiated upon the request of a creditor or mortgage
holder:
1. Shall not exceed ten percent (10%)[six percent (6%)] of the sale price on sales of real property,
which may be an auction premium or commission charged to the sale of the property; and
2. Shall not exceed twenty-five percent (25%)[twenty percent (20%)] of the sale price on sales of
personal property. Notwithstanding this subparagraph, the fee for sales of personal property
may include an additional auction premium of up to ten percent (10%) of the sale price;
(b) In the instance of any other court-ordered or court-decreed sale of real or personal property,[ the fee
paid the auctioneer] shall be agreed upon between the auctioneer and the person making the request;
and
(c) Shall not include the fees and expenses provided for by rule of the Supreme Court under KRS
31A.010(4) that are incurred by the master commissioner for the sale.
(2) Upon the request of the creditor or mortgage holder, when property is ordered to be sold by a court, the master
commissioner, as described in KRS Chapter 31A, shall employ a licensed auctioneer to handle the sale upon
terms and conditions acceptable to the creditor or mortgage holder.
(3) If real property is sold at a public sale conducted by a licensed auctioneer, then the sale shall be conducted on
the site of the real property to be sold. Notwithstanding this subsection, the sale may be conducted at another
location in the county in which the real property is located if the licensed auctioneer determines that is the
best site for the sale.
(4) If the master commissioner is also a licensed auctioneer, then the master commissioner shall not receive any
extra fee for acting as an auctioneer, but shall receive fees in his or her capacity as master commissioner or
special commissioner under KRS 31A.010(4).
(5) [Nothing contained in ]This section shall not waive any provision of KRS 426.160, 426.200, or 426.560.
(6) Nonforeclosure sales shall be conducted in a manner agreed to by the master commissioner or plaintiff and
the auctioneer.
Section 2. KRS 382.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All deeds, mortgages, and other instruments required by law to be recorded to be effectual against purchasers
without notice, or creditors, shall be recorded in the county clerk's office of the county in which the property
conveyed, or the greater part of the property conveyed[thereof], is located.
(2) A[No] county clerk or deputy county clerk shall not admit to record any deed of conveyance of any interest in
real property equal to or greater than a life estate[,] unless the deed plainly specifies and refers to the
immediate source from which the grantor derived title to the property or the interest conveyed in the
deed[therein].
(3) (a) An authentic photocopy of any original record may be certified[,] as a true, complete, unaltered copy of
the original record on file by the official public custodian of the record.
(b) A certified copy of a document[ certified by the official public custodian of that document] may be
submitted for filing in any other filing officer's jurisdiction as though it were the original record.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
However, a[no] county clerk or deputy county clerk shall not accept for filing any original document or
certified copy of any document unless the original document and its certified copy conform[conforms]
to all statutory requirements for filing the document under KRS Chapter 382.[ The provisions of ]
(c) This subsection shall apply only to a record generated and filed in Kentucky, and only if the certified
copy of the record[thereof] is to be utilized in Kentucky. If the record is a foreign record or a Kentucky
record to be filed or utilized in a foreign jurisdiction, then this subsection shall not apply and applicable
federal, Kentucky, or foreign law shall apply.
(4) If the source of title is a deed or other recorded writing, the deed offered for record shall refer to the former
deed or writing, and give the office, book, and page where recorded, and the date of recording[thereof]. If the
property or interest in the property[therein] is obtained by inheritance or in any other way than by recorded
instrument of writing, the deed offered for record shall state clearly and accurately how and from whom the
title to the property or interest[thereto] was obtained by the grantor.
(5) If the title to the property or interest conveyed is obtained from two (2) or more sources, the deed offered for
record shall plainly specify and refer to each of the sources in the manner provided in subsections (2) and (4)
of this section, and shall show which part of the property, or interest in the property[therein], was obtained
from each of the sources.
(6) A[No] grantor shall not lodge for record, and a[no] county clerk or deputy shall not receive and permit to be
lodged for record, any deed that does not comply with[ the provisions of] this section.
(7) A[No] clerk or deputy clerk shall not be liable for[to] the fine imposed by subsection (1) of KRS 382.990
because of any erroneous or false references in any[ such] deed, nor because of the omission of a reference
required by law where it does not appear on the face of the[such] deed that the title to the property or interest
conveyed was obtained from more than one (1) source.
(8) This section does not apply to deeds made by any court commissioner, sheriff, or by any[ officer of] court
officer in pursuance of his or her duty as a court[such] officer, nor to any deed or instrument made and
acknowledged before March 20, 1928. A[No] deed shall not be invalid because it is lodged contrary to[ the
provisions of] this section.
(9) A mortgage holder shall file a deed in lieu of foreclosure in the county clerk's office of the county in which the
property conveyed, or the greater part of the property conveyed[thereof], is located, no later than forty-five
(45) days after the date the deed in lieu of foreclosure is executed.
(10) (a) A deed filed pursuant to KRS 426.577 shall be filed by the grantee within five (5) business days of
receipt of the deed from the commissioner appointed by a court to convey the property.
(b) If the property is located within the boundaries of a municipal government and the grantee has not
filed the deed from the commissioner within thirty (30) business days of its receipt, the municipal
government may file a petition in the Circuit Court of the county where the property is located
requesting the court to enter an order:
1. Compelling the filing of the deed by the grantee; and
2. Awarding court costs and attorney's fees incurred in bringing the petition.
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.